Missouri, session 2026, HB3440.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 578, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 578.712, to read as follows:
578.712. 1. A person commits the offense of tampering with an elected county
official if, with the purpose to harass, intimidate, or influence such official in the
performance of such official's official duties, the person disseminates through any
means, including by posting on the internet, the elected county official's or the elected
county official's family's personal information.
2. The offense of tampering with an elected county official is a class A
misdemeanor. If a violation of this section results in death or bodily injury to an elected
county official or a member of the elected county official's family, the offense is a class B
felony.
3. For purposes of this section, "personal information" includes a home address,
Social Security number, federal tax identification number, checking or savings account
number, marital status, and identity of a child under eighteen years of age.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.